de: Unterstützte Speicherlaufwerksschnittstellen: FCAL; HSDL; IDE; M.2; Micro SATA; Micro SATA II; Micro SATA III; Micro Serial ATA; Micro Serial ATA II; Micro Serial ATA III; Mini-PCI-Express; Mini ZIF; NVMe; NVMe 3.0; PCI-Express; PCI-Express 2.0; PCI-Express 3.0; PCI-Express 3.1; PCI-Express 4.0; PCI-Express 5.0; Parallel-ATA; SAS; SAS-2; SAS-3; SAS-4; SATA; SATA II; SATA III; Serial ATA; Serial ATA II; Serial ATA III; Seriell angebundenes SCSI; Ultra M.2; ZIF; eSATA; mSATA; Sonstiges
cs: Podporovaná rozhraní jednotky úložiště: FCAL; HSDL; IDE; M.2; Micro SATA; Micro SATA II; Micro SATA III; Micro Serial ATA; Micro Serial ATA II; Micro Serial ATA III; Mini PCI Express; Mini ZIF; NVMe; NVMe 3.0; PCI Express; PCI Express 2.0; PCI Express 3.0; PCI Express 3.1; PCI Express 4.0; PCI Express 5.0; Parallel ATA; SAS; SAS-2; SAS-3; SAS-4; SATA; SATA II; SATA III; Serial ATA; Serial ATA II; Serial ATA III; Sériově připojené SCSI; Ultra M.2; ZIF; eSATA; mSATA; Jiné
hr-HR: Podržana sučelja pogona za pohranu: FCAL; HSDL; IDE; M.2; Micro SATA; Micro SATA II; Micro SATA III; Mikro serijski ATA; Mikro serijski ATA II; Mikro serijski ATA III; Mini PCI Express; Mini ZIF; NVMe; NVMe 3.0; PCI Express; PCI Express 2.0; PCI Express 3.0; PCI Express 3.1; PCI Express 4.0; PCI Express 5.0; Parallel ATA; SAS; SAS-2; SAS-3; SAS-4; SATA; SATA II; SATA III; Serijski ATA; Serijski ATA II; Serijski ATA III; Serial Attached SCSI; Ultra M.2; ZIF; eSATA; mSATA; Ostalo
pt-PT: Interfaces de unidade de armazenamento suportadas: FCAL; HSDL; IDE; M.2; Micro SATA; Micro SATA II; Micro SATA III; Micro serial ATA; Micro serial ATA II; Micro serial ATA III; Mini PCI express; Mini ZIF; NVMe; NVMe 3.0; PCI express; PCI express 2.0; PCI express 3.0; PCI express 3.1; PCI express 4.0; PCI express 5.0; Parallel ATA; SAS; SAS-2; SAS-3; SAS-4; SATA; SATA II; SATA III; Serial ATA; Serial ATA II; Serial ATA III; Serial attached SCSI; Ultra M.2; ZIF; eSATA; mSATA; Outro
zh-TW: 支援的儲存驅動器介面: FCAL; HSDL; IDE; M.2; Micro SATA; Micro SATA II; Micro SATA III; Micro serial ATA; Micro serial ATA II; Micro serial ATA III; Mini PCI express; Mini ZIF; NVMe; NVMe 3.0; PCI express; PCI express 2.0; PCI express 3.0; PCI express 3.1; PCI express 4.0; PCI express 5.0; Parallel ATA; SAS; SAS-2; SAS-3; SAS-4; SATA; SATA II; SATA III; Serial ATA; Serial ATA II; Serial ATA III; Serial attached SCSI; Ultra M.2; ZIF; eSATA; mSATA; 其他
el: Υποστηριζόμενες διεπαφές μονάδας αποθήκευσης: FCAL; HSDL; IDE; M.2; Micro SATA; Micro SATA II; Micro SATA III; Micro serial ATA; Micro serial ATA II; Micro serial ATA III; Mini PCI express; Mini ZIF; NVMe; NVMe 3.0; PCI express; PCI express 2.0; PCI express 3.0; PCI express 3.1; PCI express 4.0; PCI express 5.0; Parallel ATA; SAS; SAS-2; SAS-3; SAS-4; SATA; SATA II; SATA III; Serial ATA; Serial ATA II; Σειρά ATA III; Serial attached SCSI; Ultra M.2; ZIF; eSATA; mSATA; Άλλο
it: Interfacce dell'unità di storage supportate: FCAL; HSDL; IDE; M.2; Micro SATA; Micro SATA II; Micro SATA III; Micro serial ATA; Micro serial ATA II; Micro serial ATA III; Mini PCI express; Mini ZIF; NVMe; NVMe 3.0; PCI express; PCI express 2.0; PCI express 3.0; PCI express 3.1; PCI express 4.0; PCI express 5.0; Parallel ATA; SAS; SAS-2; SAS-3; SAS-4; SATA; SATA II; SATA III; Serial ATA; Serial ATA II; Serial ATA III; Serial attached SCSI; Ultra M.2; ZIF; eSATA; mSATA; Altro
zh-CN: 支持的存储驱动器接口: FCAL; HSDL; IDE; M.2; Micro SATA; Micro SATA II; Micro SATA III; Micro 串行 ATA; Micro 串行 ATA II; Micro 串行 ATA III; 迷你 PCIe; 迷你 ZIF; NVMe; NVMe 3.0; PCIe; PCIe 2.0; PCIe 3.0; PCIe 3.1; PCIe 4.0; PCIe 5.0; 并行 ATA; SAS; SAS-2; SAS-3; SAS-4; SATA; SATA II; SATA III; 串行 ATA; 串行 ATA II; 串行 ATA III; 串行连接 SCSI; Ultra M.2; ZIF; eSATA; mSATA; 其他
hu: Támogatott tárolómeghajtó-interfészek: FCAL; HSDL; IDE; M.2; Mikro SATA; Mikro SATA II; Mikro SATA III; Mikro soros ATA; Mikro soros ATA II; Mikro soros ATA III; Mini PCI express; Mini ZIF; NVMe; NVMe 3.0; PCI express; PCI express 2.0; PCI express 3.0; PCI express 3.1; PCI express 4.0; PCI express 5.0; Párhuzamos ATA; SAS; SAS-2; SAS-3; SAS-4; SATA; SATA II; SATA III; Soros ATA; Soros ATA II; Soros ATA III; Soros csatolású SCSI; Ultra M.2; ZIF; eSATA; mSATA; Egyéb
th: รอบรับไดรฟ์จัดเก็บข้อมูล: FCAL; HSDL; IDE; M.2; Micro SATA; Micro SATA II; Micro SATA III; Micro serial ATA; Micro serial ATA II; Micro serial ATA III; Mini PCIe; Mini ZIF; NVMe; NVMe 3.0; PCIe; PCIe 2.0; PCIe 3.0; PCIe 3.1; PCIe 4.0; PCIe 5.0; ATA แบบขนาน; SAS; SAS-2; SAS-3; SAS-4; SATA; SATA II; SATA III; Serial ATA; Serial ATA II; Serial ATA III; SCSI แบบอนุกรม (SAS); Ultra M.2; ZIF; eSATA; mSATA; อื่นๆ
ru: Поддерживаемые интерфейсы накопителя: FCAL; HSDL; IDE; M.2; Micro SATA; Micro SATA II; Micro SATA III; Micro serial ATA; Micro serial ATA II; Micro serial ATA III; Mini PCI express; Mini ZIF; NVMe; NVMe 3.0; PCI express; PCI express 2.0; PCI express 3.0; PCI express 3.1; PCI express 4.0; PCI express 5.0; Parallel ATA; SAS; SAS-2; SAS-3; SAS-4; SATA; SATA II; SATA III; Serial ATA; Serial ATA II; Serial ATA III; Serial attached SCSI; Ultra M.2; ZIF; eSATA; mSATA; Другой
bg-BG: Поддържани интерфейси на устройства за съхранение: FCAL; HSDL; IDE; M.2; Micro SATA; Micro SATA II; Micro SATA III; Micro Serial ATA; Micro Serial ATA II; Micro Serial ATA III; Mini PCI express; Mini ZIF; NVMe; NVMe 3.0; PCI express; PCI express 2.0; PCI express 3.0; PCI express 3.1; PCI express 4.0; PCI express 5.0; Паралелен ATA; SAS; SAS-2; SAS-3; SAS-4; SATA; SATA II; SATA III; Serial ATA; Serial ATA II; Serial ATA III; Серийно свързан SCSI; Ultra M.2; ZIF; eSATA; mSATA; Други
da: Understøttede lagerdrevgrænser: FCAL; HSDL; IDE; M.2; Micro SATA; Micro SATA II; Micro SATA III; Micro-seriel ATA; Micro-seriel ATA II; Micro-seriel ATA III; Mini PCI express; Mini ZIF; NVMe; NVMe 3.0; PCI express; PCI express 2.0; PCI express 3.0; PCI express 3.1; PCI express 4.0; PCI express 5.0; Parallel ATA; SAS; SAS-2; SAS-3; SAS-4; SATA; SATA II; SATA III; Seriel NOR; Seriel ATA II; Seriel ATA III; Serieforbundet SCSI; Ultra M.2; ZIF; eSATA; mSATA; Andet
pl: Obsługiwane interfejsy napędu pamięci masowej: FCAL; HSDL; IDE; M.2; Micro SATA; Micro SATA II; Micro SATA III; Micro serial ATA; Micro serial ATA II; Micro serial ATA III; Mini PCI express; Mini ZIF; NVMe; NVMe 3.0; PCI express; PCI express 2.0; PCI express 3.0; PCI express 3.1; PCI express 4.0; PCI express 5.0; Równoległy ATA; SAS; SAS-2; SAS-3; SAS-4; SATA; SATA II; SATA III; Serial ATA; Serial ATA II; Serial ATA III; SCSI dołączony szeregowo; Ultra M.2; ZIF; eSATA; mSATA; Pozostałe
en: Storage drive interfaces supported: FCAL; HSDL; IDE; M.2; Micro SATA; Micro SATA II; Micro SATA III; Micro serial ATA; Micro serial ATA II; Micro serial ATA III; Mini PCI express; Mini ZIF; NVMe; NVMe 3.0; PCI express; PCI express 2.0; PCI express 3.0; PCI express 3.1; PCI express 4.0; PCI express 5.0; Parallel ATA; SAS; SAS-2; SAS-3; SAS-4; SATA; SATA II; SATA III; Serial ATA; Serial ATA II; Serial ATA III; Serial attached SCSI; Ultra M.2; ZIF; eSATA; mSATA; Other
fr: Interfaces de lecteurs de stockage prises en charge: FCAL; HSDL; IDE; M.2; Micro SATA; Micro SATA II; Micro SATA III; Micro-série ATA; Micro-série ATA II; Micro-série ATA III; Mini PCI express; Mini ZIF; NVMe; NVMe 3.0; PCI express; PCI express 2.0; PCI express 3.0; PCI express 3.1; PCI express 4.0; PCI express 5.0; Parallel ATA; SAS; SAS-2; SAS-3; SAS-4; SATA; SATA II; SATA III; Serial ATA; Serial ATA II; Serial ATA III; SCSI connecté en série; Ultra M.2; ZIF; eSATA; mSATA; Autre
sl-SI: Podprti vmesniki pomnilniških pogonov: FCAL; HSDL; IDE; M.2; Micro SATA; Micro SATA II; Micro SATA III; Micro serial ATA; Micro serial ATA II; Micro serial ATA III; Mini PCI express; Mini ZIF; NVMe; NVMe 3.0; PCI express; PCI express 2.0; PCI express 3.0; PCI express 3.1; PCI express 4.0; PCI express 5.0; Parallel ATA; SAS; SAS-2; SAS-3; SAS-4; SATA; SATA II; SATA III; Serial ATA; Serial ATA II; Serial ATA III; Serial attached SCSI; Ultra M.2; ZIF; eSATA; mSATA; Drugo
sk-SK: Podporované rozhrania úložných jednotiek: FCAL; HSDL; IDE; M.2; Micro SATA; Micro SATA II; Micro SATA III; Micro serial ATA; Micro serial ATA II; Micro serial ATA III; Mini PCI Express; Mini ZIF; NVMe; NVMe 3.0; PCI Express; PCI Express 2.0; PCI Express 3.0; PCI Express 3.1; PCI Express 4.0; PCI Express 5.0; Parallel ATA; SAS; SAS-2; SAS-3; SAS-4; SATA; SATA II; SATA III; Serial ATA; Serial ATA II; Serial ATA III; Sériovo pripojené SCSI; Ultra M.2; ZIF; eSATA; mSATA; Iné
pt-BR: Interfaces da unidade de armazenamento com suporte: FCAL; HSDL; IDE; M.2; Micro SATA; Micro SATA II; Micro SATA III; Micro serial ATA; Micro serial ATA II; Micro serial ATA III; Mini PCI express; Mini ZIF; NVMe; NVMe 3.0; PCI express; PCI express 2.0; PCI express 3.0; PCI express 3.1; PCI express 4.0; PCI express 5.0; Parallel ATA; SAS; SAS-2; SAS-3; SAS-4; SATA; SATA II; SATA III; Serial ATA; Serial ATA II; Serial ATA III; Serial attached SCSI; Ultra M.2; ZIF; eSATA; mSATA; Outro
tr: Desteklenen Depolama Sürücüsü Arayüzleri: FCAL; HSDL; IDE; M.2; Micro SATA; Micro SATA II; Micro SATA III; Micro serial ATA; Micro serial ATA II; Micro serial ATA III; Mini PCI Express; Mini ZIF; NVMe; NVMe 3.0; PCI Express; PCI Express 2.0; PCI Express 3.0; PCI Express 3.1; PCI Express 4.0; PCI Express 5.0; Paralel ATA; SAS; SAS-2; SAS-3; SAS-4; SATA; SATA II; SATA III; Seri ATA; Seri ATA II; Seri ATA III; Seri bağlı SCSI; Ultra M.2; ZIF; eSATA; mSATA; Diğer
nb: Støttede grensesnitt for lagringsstasjon: FCAL; HSDL; IDE; M.2; Micro SATA; Micro SATA II; Micro SATA III; Micro serial ATA; Micro serial ATA II; Micro serial ATA III; Mini PCI express; Mini ZIF; NVMe; NVMe 3.0; PCI express; PCI express 2.0; PCI express 3.0; PCI express 3.1; PCI express 4.0; PCI express 5.0; Parallell ATA; SAS; SAS-2; SAS-3; SAS-4; SATA; SATA II; SATA III; Serial ATA; Serial ATA II; Serial ATA III; Serietilkoblet SCSI; Ultra M.2; ZIF; eSATA; mSATA; Annen
nl: Ondersteunde interfaces opslagschijf: FCAL; HSDL; IDE; M.2; Micro SATA; Micro SATA II; Micro SATA III; Micro serial ATA; Micro serial ATA II; Micro serial ATA III; Mini PCI express; Mini ZIF; NVMe; NVMe 3.0; PCI express; PCI express 2.0; PCI express 3.0; PCI express 3.1; PCI express 4.0; PCI express 5.0; Parallel ATA; SAS; SAS-2; SAS-3; SAS-4; SATA; SATA II; SATA III; Serial ATA; Serial ATA II; Serial ATA III; Serial attached SCSI; Ultra M.2; ZIF; eSATA; mSATA; Andere
vi: Giao diện ổ lưu trữ được hỗ trợ: FCAL; Đường dây thuê bao kỹ thuật số tốc độ cao; Môi trường phát triển tích hợp; M.2; Micro SATA; Micro SATA II; Micro SATA III; Micro công nghệ truyền tải nối tiếp; Micro công nghệ truyền tải nối tiếp II; Micro công nghệ truyền tải nối tiếp III; Giao diện card ngoại vi PCIe thu nhỏ; ZIF nhỏ; Bộ nhớ bất biến tốc hành; Bộ nhớ bất biến tốc hành 3.0; Chuẩn kết nối tốc độ cao; Chuẩn kết nối tốc độ cao 2.0; Chuẩn kết nối tốc độ cao 3.0; Chuẩn kết nối tốc độ cao 3.1; Chuẩn kết nối tốc độ cao 4.0; Chuẩn kết nối tốc độ cao 5.0; Cáp ATA; Hệ thống phân tích thống kê; Hệ thống phân tích thống kê 2; Hệ thống phân tích thống kê 3; Hệ thống phân tích thống kê 4; Công nghệ truyền tải nối tiếp (SATA); Công nghệ truyền tải nối tiếp (SATA) II; Công nghệ truyền tải nối tiếp (SATA) III; Công nghệ truyền tải nối tiếp; Công nghệ truyền tải nối tiếp II; Công nghệ truyền tải nối tiếp III; Ổ cứng SAS; M2 Ultra; Ổ cắm ZIF; Biến thể của chuẩn kết nối SATA; mSATA; Khác
ko: 지원되는 스토리지 드라이브 인터페이스: FCAL; HSDL; IDE; M.2; Micro SATA; Micro SATA II; Micro SATA III; Micro serial ATA; Micro serial ATA II; Micro serial ATA III; Mini PCI express; Mini ZIF; NVMe; NVMe 3.0; PCI express; PCI express 2.0; PCI express 3.0; PCI express 3.1; PCI express 4.0; PCI express 5.0; Parallel ATA; SAS; SAS-2; SAS-3; SAS-4; SATA; SATA II; SATA III; Serial ATA; Serial ATA II; Serial ATA III; Serial attached SCSI; Ultra M.2; ZIF; eSATA; mSATA; 기타
sv: Kompatibla gränssnitt för lagringsenhet: FCAL; HSDL; IDE; M.2; Micro SATA; Micro SATA II; Micro SATA III; Micro serial ATA; Micro serial ATA II; Micro serial ATA III; Mini PCI express; Mini ZIF; NVMe; NVMe 3.0; PCI express; PCI express 2.0; PCI express 3.0; PCI express 3.1; PCI express 4.0; PCI express 5.0; Parallel ATA; SAS; SAS-2; SAS-3; SAS-4; SATA; SATA II; SATA III; Serial ATA; Serial ATA II; Serial ATA III; Serial attached SCSI; Ultra M.2; ZIF; eSATA; mSATA; Annat
es: Interfaces de unidad de almacenamiento compatibles: FCAL; HSDL; IDE; M.2; Micro SATA; Micro SATA II; Micro SATA III; Micro serial ATA; Micro serial ATA II; Micro serial ATA III; Mini PCI express; Mini ZIF; NVMe; NVMe 3.0; PCI express; PCI express 2.0; PCI express 3.0; PCI express 3.1; PCI express 4.0; PCI express 5.0; Parallel ATA; SAS; SAS-2; SAS-3; SAS-4; SATA; SATA II; SATA III; Serial ATA; Serial ATA II; Serial ATA III; SCSI conectado en serie; Ultra M.2; ZIF; eSATA; mSATA; Otros
lt-LT: Palaikomos atmintinės disko sąsajos: FCAL; HSDL; IDE; M.2; „Micro SATA“; „Micro SATA II“; „Micro SATA III“; „Micro serial ATA“; „Micro serial ATA II“; „Micro serial ATA III“; „Mini PCI express“; „Mini ZIF“; NVMe; NVMe 3.0; „PCI express“; „PCI express 2.0“; „PCI express 3.0“; „PCI express 3.1“; „PCI express 4.0“; „PCI express 5.0“; „Parallel ATA“; SAS; SAS-2; SAS-3; SAS-4; SATA; SATA II; SATA III; „Serial ATA“; „Serial ATA II“; „Serial ATA III“; „Serial attached SCSI“; „Ultra M.2“; ZIF; eSATA; mSATA; Kita
ro-RO: Tipul de interfață acceptată pentru unitatea de stocare: FCAL; HSDL; IDE; M.2; Micro SATA; Micro SATA II; Micro SATA III; Micro serial ATA; Micro serial ATA II; Micro serial ATA III; Mini PCI express; Mini ZIF; NVMe; NVMe 3.0; PCI express; PCI express 2.0; PCI express 3.0; PCI express 3.1; PCI express 4.0; PCI express 5.0; Parallel ATA; SAS; SAS-2; SAS-3; SAS-4; SATA; SATA II; SATA III; Serial ATA; Serial ATA II; Serial ATA III; SCSI atașat în serie; Ultra M.2; ZIF; eSATA; mSATA; Altele
ja: 対応ストレージ・ドライブ・インターフェース: FCAL; HSDL; IDE; M.2; マイクロSATA; マイクロSATA II; マイクロSATAⅢ; マイクロシリアルATA; マイクロシリアルATA II; マイクロシリアルATAⅢ; ミニ PCI エクスプレス; ミニZIF; NVMe; NVMe 3.0; PCIエクスプレス; PCIエクスプレス2.0; PCIエクスプレス3.0; PCIエクスプレス3.1; PCIエクスプレス4.0; PCIエクスプレス5.0; パラレルATA; SAS; SAS-2; SAS-3; SAS-4; SATA; SATA II; SATA III; シリアルATA; シリアルATA II; シリアルATAⅢ; シリアル接続SCSI; Ultra M.2; ZIF; eSATA; mSATA; その他
fi: Tuetut tallennusaseman käyttöliittymät: FCAL; HSDL; IDE; M.2; Micro SATA; Micro SATA II; Micro SATA III; Micro Serial ATA; Micro Serial ATA II; Micro Serial ATA III; Mini PCI express; Mini ZIF; NVMe; NVMe 3.0; Mini PCI express; PCI express 2.0; PCI express 3.0; PCI express 3.1; PCI express 4.0; PCI express 5.0; Parallel ATA; SAS; SAS-2; SAS-3; SAS-4; SATA; SATA II; SATA III; Serial ATA; Serial ATA II; Serial ATA III; Serial attached SCSI; Ultra M.2; ZIF; eSATA; mSATA; Muu